Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2994.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Healthy Arizona study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The healthy Arizona study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. One member who is a preventative health expert in this state and who is appointed by the director of the department of health services. 2. One member who is a food systems and agricultural expert in this state and who is appointed by the director of the Arizona department of agriculture. 3. One member who is a hunger relief expert in this state and who is appointed by the director of the department of economic security. 4. One member who is a child nutrition and health expert in this state and who is appointed by the director of the department of education. 5. One member who is a physical activity expert in this state and who is appointed by the director of the Arizona state parks board. 6. One member who is a local food and restaurant small business expert in this state and who is appointed by a statewide organization representing small businesses. 7. One member who represents the beverage industry in this state and who is appointed by the governor. 8. One member who is a tribal health and economy expert in this state and who is appointed by the governor's office on tribal relations. 9. One member who is a rural health and economy expert in this state and who is appointed by a statewide organization representing rural health and economic development. 10. One member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives. 11. One member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. B. Appointed members serve at the pleasure of the person who made the appointment. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible to receive reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The committee shall: 1. Meet at least once or more frequently as the committee deems necessary. 2. Solicit input and testimony from subject matter experts, stakeholders and community members regarding the effects of sugary beverage consumption on the health of the residents of this state and any fiscal impacts to this state. 3. Assess the state-level policies, strategies and resources that could reduce sugary beverage consumption and improve health outcomes in this state. 4. Identify potential sources of funding to implement state-level policies, strategies and resources that could reduce sugary beverage consumption and improve health outcomes in this state. 5. On or before December 1, 2026, submit a report regarding the committee's activities, findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2027.